Washington statutes.
RCW 6.17.160

Sheriff's execution of writ—Manner of levy.

The sheriff to whom the writ is directed and delivered shall execute the same without delay as follows:

(1) Real property, including a vendee's interests under a real estate contract, shall be levied on by recording a copy of the writ, together with a description of the property attached, with the recording officer of the county in which the real estate is situated.

(2) Personal property, capable of manual delivery, shall be levied on by taking into custody. If the property or any part of it may be concealed in a building or enclosure, the sheriff may publicly demand delivery of the property. If the property is not delivered and if the order of execution so directs, the sheriff may cause the building or enclosure to be broken open and take possession of the property.

(3) Shares of stock and other investment securities shall be levied on in accordance with the requirements of RCW 62A.8-112.

(4) A fund in court shall be levied on by leaving a copy of the writ with the clerk of the court with notice in writing specifying the fund.

(5) A franchise granted by a public or quasi-public corporation shall be levied on by (a) serving a copy of the writ on, or mailing it to, the judgment debtor as required by RCW 6.17.130 and (b) filing a copy of the writ in the office of the auditor of the county in which the franchise was granted together with a notice in writing that the franchise has been levied on to be sold, specifying the time and place of sale, the name of the owner, the amount of the judgment for which the franchise is to be sold, and the name of the judgment creditor.

(6) A vendor's interest under a real estate contract shall be levied on by (a) recording a copy of the writ, with descriptions of the contract and of the real property covered by the contract, with the recording officer of the county in which the real estate is located and (b) serving a copy of the writ, with a copy of the descriptions, on, or mailing the same to, the judgment debtor and the vendee under the contract in the manner as described in RCW 6.17.130.

(7) Other intangible personal property may be levied on by serving a copy of the writ on, or mailing it to, the judgment debtor in the manner as required by RCW 6.17.130, together with a description of the property. If the property is a claim on which suit has been commenced, a copy of the writ and of the description shall also be filed with the clerk of the court in which the suit is pending.

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 26 s 1; 2007 c 37 s 1; 1988 c 231 s 12; 1987 c 442 s 416; 1927 c 100 s 1; 1886 p 42 s 13; RRS s 659. Prior: Code 1881 ss 174-192; 1877 pp 35-40; 1873 pp 43-50; 1871 pp 9, 10; 1869 pp 41-47; 1863 pp 112-120; 1860 pp 30-36; 1854 pp 155-162. Formerly RCW 7.12.130.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 231: See note following RCW 6.01.050.

Sheriff's fees for service of process and other official services: RCW 36.18.040.